Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1480YC (1) 91 dg/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 237A.5, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection. 2 EXPLANATION 3 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 4 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 5 This bill removes the requirement that personnel working in 6 a licensed or registered child care facility must receive a 7 preemployment physical examination evidencing good health prior 8 to beginning employment. Under current law, personnel working 9 in a licensed or registered child care facility must take an 10 examination within six months prior to beginning employment. 11 Such examinations must be performed by a licensed physician 12 or physicianâs assistant, include communicable disease tests, 13 and be repeated every three years after initial employment. 14 Controlled medical conditions which would not affect the 15 performance of the employee in the capacity employed does not 16 prohibit employment. 17 -1- LSB 1480YC (1) 91 dg/ko 1/ 1